dev/punctuation.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<cm%>
%<guio%>
%<sent%>
%<quot%>
%<lpar%>
%<rpar%>

LEXICON Root

%,%<cm%>:%, # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%.%<sent%>:%. # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%"%<quot%>:%" # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
